Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.060

Creation of district—Public hearing—Legislative authority may delegate responsibility.

A county legislative authority may adopt an ordinance providing for a committee of itself, or an officer, to hold public hearings on the proposed formation of a lake or beach management district and hear objections to the proposed formation as provided in RCW 36.61.050. The committee or officer shall make a recommendation to the full legislative authority, which need not hold a public hearing on the proposed creation of the lake or beach management district. The full county legislative authority by resolution may approve or disapprove the recommendation and submit the question of creating the lake or beach management district to the property owners as provided in RCW 36.61.070 through 36.61.100.

[ 2008 c 301 s 8; 1985 c 398 s 10.]